tests/syntax/inline.sbl
// Test inlining of routines.
externals (stem external2)
booleans (b)
groupings (g)
integers (i)
strings (s)
routines (
  r_eq
  r_ge
  r_gt
  r_le
  r_lt
  r_ne
  r_booltest
  r_not_booltest
  r_grouping
  r_non
  r_goto_grouping
  r_gopast_grouping
  r_goto_non
  r_gopast_non
  r_literalstring
  r_name
  r_true
  r_false
  r_fail
  r_set
  r_unset
  r_assign
  r_plusassign
  r_minusassign
  r_multiplyassign
  r_divideassign
  r_tomark
  r_tolimit
  r_hop
  r_next
  r_delete
  r_insert
  r_attach
  r_leftslice
  r_rightslice
  r_sliceto
  r_stringassign
  r_slicefrom
  // These are canonicalised to an integer assignment or test.
  r_atlimit
  r_atmark
  r_setmark
)

define g 'aeiou'

define stem as (
  set b
  [next] -> s
  r_eq
  r_ge
  r_gt
  r_le
  r_lt
  r_ne
  r_booltest
  r_not_booltest
  r_grouping
  r_non
  r_goto_grouping
  r_gopast_grouping
  r_goto_non
  r_gopast_non
  r_literalstring
  r_name
  r_true
  do r_false
  do r_fail
  r_set
  r_unset
  r_assign
  r_plusassign
  r_minusassign
  r_multiplyassign
  r_divideassign
  r_tomark
  r_tolimit
  r_hop
  r_next
  r_delete
  r_insert
  r_attach
  r_leftslice
  r_rightslice
  r_sliceto
  r_stringassign
  r_slicefrom
  r_atlimit
  r_atmark
  r_setmark
  external2
)

// Externals should not get inlined.
define external2 as true

define r_eq as $(cursor == 1)
define r_ge as $(cursor >= 1)
define r_gt as $(cursor > 1)
define r_le as $(cursor <= 1)
define r_lt as $(cursor < 1)
define r_ne as $(cursor != 1)
define r_booltest as b
define r_not_booltest as not b
define r_grouping as g
define r_non as non-g
define r_goto_grouping as goto g
define r_gopast_grouping as gopast g
define r_goto_non as goto non-g
define r_gopast_non as gopast non-g
define r_literalstring as 'xyzzy'
define r_name as s
define r_true as true
define r_false as false
define r_fail as fail next
define r_set as set b
define r_unset as unset b
define r_assign as $i = 1
define r_plusassign as $i += 1
define r_minusassign as $i -= 1
define r_multiplyassign as $i *= 42
define r_divideassign as $i /= 6
define r_tomark as tomark i
define r_tolimit as tolimit
define r_hop as hop 2
define r_next as next
define r_delete as delete
define r_insert as insert 'x'
define r_attach as attach 'y'
define r_leftslice as [
define r_rightslice as ]
define r_sliceto as ->s
define r_stringassign as ='xyz'
define r_slicefrom as <-'x'
define r_atlimit as atlimit
define r_atmark as atmark i
define r_setmark as setmark i
